Hawaii statutes.
[§107D-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Building lease" means a contract
between the department and private investor in which the private investor
conveys an improved facility to the department for a specified period of time.

"Department" means the department of
accounting and general services.

"Development agreement" means an
agreement between the State and a private investor which, at a minimum,
includes:

(1) A description of the work to be done;

(2) The sale price for the facility;

(3) The duration of the agreement;

(4) The roles and responsibilities of the department
and the private investor; and

(5) The terms and conditions for the ground lease and
building lease.

"Facility" means property under the
management and control of the department that may contain land, buildings, or
both.

"Ground lease" means a lease of land
executed between the State and private investor pursuant to which the private
investor will renovate the existing facility, provide improvements, or
construct a new building or buildings on a specified property.

"Private investor" means a
non-governmental entity. [L 2011, c 231, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next